Hawaii statutes.
§508D-6 Later discovered inaccurate
information. Prior to closing the real estate purchase contract, a buyer
who receives a disclosure statement that fails to disclose a material fact or
contains an inaccurate assertion that directly, substantially, and adversely
affects the value of the residential real property, and who was not aware of
the foregoing failure or inaccuracy, may elect in writing to rescind the real
estate purchase contract within fifteen calendar days of the earlier to occur
of:

(1) The discovery of the failure or inaccuracy; or

(2) The receipt of an amended disclosure statement
correcting the failure or inaccuracy, in the manner provided by section
508D-5(b) or (c).

The buyer's right to rescind the real estate
purchase contract under this section shall not apply if the sale of the
residential real property has been recorded; provided that the buyer may pursue
all additional remedies provided by law. [L 1994, c 214, pt of §2; am L 1996, c
161, §6; am L 2001, c 224, §3]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next